src/french.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +V +PastPart +Past +PresPart +3P +Sg +Pl GUESS

LEXICON Root

Noun ;
Verb ;

LEXICON Noun

GUESS Ninf;

LEXICON Verb

GUESS Vinf;

LEXICON Ninf

+N+Sg:0   #;
+N+Pl:^s  #;

LEXICON Vinf

+V:0             #;
+V+3P+Sg:^s      #;
+V+Past:^ed      #;
+V+PastPart:^ed  #;
+V+PresPart:^ing #;
